Colorado statutes. TITLE 3 United States
ARTICLE 3
CONCURRENT JURISDICTION

Section

3-3-101. Concurrent jurisdiction of the United States over certain lands dedicated to national park purposes.

Concurrent legislative jurisdiction under the laws of this state is ceded to the United States over and within all the lands dedicated to national park purposes in the following tracts:

Bent's Old Fort National Historic Site;

Black Canyon of the Gunnison National Park;

Colorado National Monument;

Curecanti National Recreation Area;

Dinosaur National Monument;

Florissant Fossil Beds National Monument;

Great Sand Dunes National Monument or the Great Sand Dunes National Park upon the establishment of that park by the secretary of the interior of the United States in accordance with the federal "Great Sand Dunes National Park and Preserve Act of 2000", Pub.L. 106-530;

Great Sand Dunes National Preserve;

Hovenweep National Monument;

Yucca House National Monument.

The concurrent jurisdiction ceded by subsection (1) of this section is vested upon acceptance by the United States by and through its appropriate officials and shall continue so long as the lands within the designated areas are dedicated to park purposes.

The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to execute all proper documents for the cession granted in subsection (1) of this section upon request of the United States by and through its appropriate officials.

The state of Colorado retains concurrent jurisdiction, both civil and criminal, with the United States over all lands specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 385, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1307, § 1, effective August 8.

3-3-102. Concurrent jurisdiction of the United States over certain lands dedicated to the Piñon Canyon maneuver site in Las Animas county.

Concurrent legislative jurisdiction under the laws of this state is ceded to the United States over and within all the lands dedicated to the Piñon Canyon maneuver site in Las Animas county.

The concurrent jurisdiction ceded by subsection (1) of this section is vested upon acceptance by the United States by and through its appropriate officials and shall continue so long as the Piñon Canyon maneuver site exists.

The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to execute all proper documents for the cession granted in subsection (1) of this section upon request of the United States by and through its appropriate officials.

The state of Colorado retains concurrent jurisdiction, both civil and criminal, with the United States over all lands specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 294, § 1, effective June 6.

3-3-103. United States Air Force academy - El Paso county - concurrent jurisdiction.

The state of Colorado hereby cedes concurrent legislative jurisdiction under the laws of this state to the United States over and within the lands dedicated to the United States Air Force academy site in El Paso county.

The concurrent jurisdiction ceded in subsection (1) of this section is vested upon acceptance by the United States by and through its appropriate officials and shall continue for as long as the United States Air Force academy site is located in El Paso county.

Upon request by the United States by and through its appropriate officials, the governor is authorized and empowered to execute the appropriate documents to accomplish the cession granted by this section.

The state of Colorado retains concurrent jurisdiction, both civil and criminal, with the United States over all lands specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 744, § 1, effective May 23.

3-3-104. Rocky Mountain arsenal - Adams county - concurrent jurisdiction.

The state of Colorado hereby accepts the relinquishment of legislative jurisdiction from the United States over four hundred twelve property tracts within the Rocky Mountain arsenal in Adams county. The state of Colorado shall have concurrent legislative jurisdiction with the United States over the property indicated in this paragraph (a) for as long as the United States owns the property.

The concurrent legislative jurisdiction created by this section over the property indicated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall take effect upon acceptance by the governor of a notice filed by the secretary of the Army pursuant to 10 U.S.C. sec. 2683 relinquishing legislative jurisdiction and retaining concurrent legislative jurisdiction over the property. The governor shall notify the office of legislative legal services of the date of acceptance of the notice.

The state shall not incur or assume any liability as a result of accepting concurrent legislative jurisdiction pursuant to this subsection (1).

The state of Colorado hereby cedes concurrent legislative jurisdiction under the laws of this state to the United States over property tracts A-107 and B-353 within the Rocky Mountain arsenal in Adams county.

The concurrent legislative jurisdiction ceded in this subsection (2) is vested upon acceptance by the United States through its appropriate officials and shall continue for as long as the United States owns the property.

Upon request by the United States through its appropriate officials, the governor is authorized to execute the appropriate documents to accomplish the cession granted by this subsection (2).

The state of Colorado retains concurrent jurisdiction, both civil and criminal, with the United States over all property specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2558, § 1, effective June 5.

3-3-105. Pueblo chemical depot - concurrent jurisdiction - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The Pueblo depot activity development authority, created in 1994 by the general assembly, focused on the redevelopment of the United States Army Pueblo chemical depot to support job creation and economic growth;

The United States department of defense formally recognized the Pueblo depot activity development authority as the local development authority in 1995;

In 2013, over fifteen thousand acres of land of the United States Army Pueblo chemical depot was deemed surplus federal property and the Pueblo depot activity development authority officially changed their name to PuebloPlex;

In order to fully utilize the surplus land, the general assembly must establish concurrent legislative jurisdiction with the federal government by the governor formally accepting this jurisdiction from the secretary of the Army; and

The concurrent legislative jurisdiction seeks to avoid jurisdictional confusion and ensure emergency and police services are offered and available for the redevelopment of PuebloPlex.

The state of Colorado hereby accepts the relinquishment of exclusive legislative jurisdiction from the United States over the real property comprising the United States Army Pueblo chemical depot. The state of Colorado shall have concurrent legislative jurisdiction with the United States over the property indicated in this subsection (2)(a) for as long as the United States owns the property.

The concurrent legislative jurisdiction created by this section over the property indicated in subsection (2)(a) of this section shall take effect upon acceptance by the governor of a notice filed by the secretary of the Army pursuant to 10 U.S.C. sec. 2683 relinquishing exclusive legislative jurisdiction and retaining concurrent legislative jurisdiction over the property. The governor shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing, by e-mail sent to revisorofstatutes.ga@state.co.us, of the date of acceptance of the notice.

The state shall not incur or assume any liability as a result of accepting concurrent legislative jurisdiction pursuant to this subsection (2).

Upon request by the United States through its appropriate officials, the governor is authorized to execute the appropriate documents to accomplish the cession granted by subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-004), ch. 46, p. 193, § 1, effective September 7.